Oklahoma, session 2025, SB332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 427.14, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 342, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 427.14), is amended to read as follows:


Section 427.14. A. There is hereby created the medical


marijuana business license, which shall include the following


categories:


1. Medical marijuana commercial grower;


2. Medical marijuana processor;


3. Medical marijuana dispensary;


4. Medical marijuana transporter; and


5. Medical marijuana testing laboratory.



Req. No. 636 Page 1


B. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority, with the aid of


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services, shall develop a


website for medical marijuana business applications.


C. The Authority shall make available on its website in an


easy-to-find location, applications for a medical marijuana


business.


D. 1. The annual, nonrefundable fee for a medical marijuana


transporter license shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00).


2. The initial, nonrefundable fee for a medical marijuana


commercial grower license shall be calculated based upon the total


amount of square feet of canopy or acres the grower estimates will


be harvested, transferred, or sold for the year. The annual,


nonrefundable license fee shall be based upon the total amount of


square feet of canopy or acres harvested, transferred, or sold by


the grower during the previous twelve (12) months. The amount of


the fees shall be determined as follows:


a. For an indoor, greenhouse, or light deprivation


medical marijuana grow facility:


(1) Tier 1: Up to ten thousand (10,000) square feet


of canopy, the fee shall be Two Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00),


(2) Tier 2: Ten thousand one (10,001) square feet of


canopy to twenty thousand (20,000) square feet of

Req. No. 636 Page 2


canopy, the fee shall be Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00),


(3) Tier 3: Twenty thousand one (20,001) square feet


of canopy to forty thousand (40,000) square feet


of canopy, the fee shall be Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00),


(4) Tier 4: Forty thousand one (40,001) square feet


of canopy to sixty thousand (60,000) square feet


of canopy, the fee shall be Twenty Thousand


Dollars ($20,000.00),


(5) Tier 5: Sixty thousand one (60,001) square feet


of canopy to eighty thousand (80,000) square feet


of canopy, the fee shall be Thirty Thousand


Dollars ($30,000.00),


(6) Tier 6: Eighty thousand one (80,001) square feet


of canopy to ninety-nine thousand nine hundred


ninety-nine (99,999) square feet of canopy, the


fee shall be Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00),


and


(7) Tier 7: One hundred thousand (100,000) square


feet of canopy and beyond, the fee shall be Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), plus an additional


twenty-five cents ($0.25) per square foot of



Req. No. 636 Page 3


canopy over one hundred thousand (100,000) square


feet.


b. For an outdoor medical marijuana grow facility:


(1) Tier 1: Less than two and one-half (2 1/2)


acres, the fee shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($2,500.00),


(2) Tier 2: More than two and one-half (2 1/2) acres


up to five (5) acres, the fee shall be Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),


(3) Tier 3: More than five (5) acres up to ten (10)


acres, the fee shall be Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00),


(4) Tier 4: More than ten (10) acres up to twenty


(20) acres, the fee shall be Twenty Thousand


Dollars ($20,000.00),


(5) Tier 5: More than twenty (20) acres up to thirty


(30) acres, the fee shall be Thirty Thousand


Dollars ($30,000.00),


(6) Tier 6: More than thirty (30) acres up to forty


(40) acres, the fee shall be Forty Thousand


Dollars ($40,000.00),


(7) Tier 7: More than forty (40) acres up to fifty


(50) acres, the fee shall be Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($50,000.00), and

Req. No. 636 Page 4


(8) Tier 8: If the amount of acreage exceeds fifty


(50) acres, the fee shall be Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($50,000.00) plus an additional Two


Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) per acre.


c. For a medical marijuana commercial grower that has a


combination of both indoor and outdoor growing


facilities at one location, the medical marijuana


commercial grower shall be required to obtain a


separate license from the Authority for each type of


grow operation and shall be subject to the licensing


fees provided for in subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph.


d. As used in this paragraph:


(1) “canopy” means the total surface area within a


cultivation area that is dedicated to the


cultivation of flowering marijuana plants. The


surface area of the plant canopy must be


calculated in square feet and measured and must


include all of the area within the boundaries


where the cultivation of the flowering marijuana


plants occurs. If the surface of the plant


canopy consists of noncontiguous areas, each


component area must be separated by identifiable


boundaries. If a tiered or shelving system is

Req. No. 636 Page 5


used in the cultivation area, the surface area of


each tier or shelf must be included in


calculating the area of the plant canopy.


Calculation of the area of the plant canopy may


not include the areas within the cultivation area


that are used to cultivate immature marijuana


plants and seedlings, prior to flowering, and


that are not used at any time to cultivate mature


marijuana plants. If the flowering plants are


vertically grown in cylinders, the square footage


of the canopy shall be measured by the


circumference of the cylinder multiplied by the


total length of the cylinder,


(2) “greenhouse” means a structure located outdoors


that is completely covered by a material that


allows a controlled level of light transmission,


and


(3) “light deprivation” means a structure that has


concrete floors and the ability to manipulate


natural light.


3. The initial, nonrefundable fee for a medical marijuana


processor license shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00). The annual, nonrefundable license fee for a medical



Req. No. 636 Page 6


marijuana processor license shall be determined based on the


previous twelve (12) months as follows:


a. Tier 1: The transfer or sale of zero (0) to ten


thousand (10,000) pounds of biomass or the production,


transfer, or sale of up to one hundred (100) liters of


cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater, the annual


fee shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00),


b. Tier 2: The transfer or sale of ten thousand one


(10,001) pounds to fifty thousand (50,000) pounds of


biomass or the production, transfer, or sale of one


hundred one (101) to three hundred fifty (350) liters


of cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater, the


annual fee shall be Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),


c. Tier 3: The transfer or sale of fifty thousand one


(50,001) pounds to one hundred fifty thousand


(150,000) pounds of biomass or the production,


transfer, or sale of three hundred fifty-one (351) to


six hundred fifty (650) liters of cannabis


concentrate, whichever is greater, the annual fee


shall be Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00),


d. Tier 4: The transfer or sale of one hundred fifty


thousand one (150,001) pounds to three hundred


thousand (300,000) pounds of biomass or the

Req. No. 636 Page 7


production, transfer, or sale of six hundred fifty-one


(651) to one thousand (1,000) liters of cannabis


concentrate, whichever is greater, the annual fee


shall be Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), and


e. Tier 5: The transfer or sale of more than three


hundred thousand one (300,001) pounds of biomass or


the production, transfer, or sale in excess of one


thousand one (1,001) liters of cannabis concentrate,


the annual fee shall be Twenty Thousand Dollars


($20,000.00).


For purposes of this paragraph only, if the cannabis concentrate


is in nonliquid form, every one thousand (1,000) grams of


concentrated marijuana shall be calculated as one (1) liter of


cannabis concentrate.


4. The initial, nonrefundable fee for a medical marijuana


dispensary license shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00). The annual, nonrefundable license fee for a medical


marijuana dispensary license shall be calculated at ten percent


(10%) of the sum of twelve (12) calendar months of the combined


annual state sales tax and state excise tax of the dispensary during


the previous twelve (12) months. The minimum fee shall be not less


than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) and the maximum


fee shall not exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) Four Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($4,500.00).

Req. No. 636 Page 8


5. The annual, nonrefundable license fee for a medical


marijuana testing laboratory shall be Twenty Thousand Dollars


($20,000.00).


E. All applicants seeking licensure or licensure renewal as a


medical marijuana business shall comply with the following general


requirements:


1. All applications for licenses and registrations authorized


pursuant to this section shall be made upon forms prescribed by the


Authority;


2. Each application shall identify the city or county in which


the applicant seeks to obtain licensure as a medical marijuana


business;


3. Applicants shall submit a complete application to the


Authority before the application may be accepted or considered;


4. All applications shall be complete and accurate in every


detail;


5. All applications shall include all attachments or


supplemental information required by the forms supplied by the


Authority;


6. All applications for a transporter license, initial


dispensary license, initial processor license, or laboratory license


shall be accompanied by a full remittance for the whole amount of


the license fee as set forth in subsection D of this section. All


submissions of grower applications, renewal processor applications,

Req. No. 636 Page 9


and renewal dispensary applications shall be accompanied by a


remittance of a fee of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00). The Authority shall invoice license applicants, if


applicable, for any additional licensing fees owed pursuant to


subsection D of this section prior to approval of a license


application. License fees are nonrefundable;


7. All applicants shall be approved for licensing review that,


at a minimum, meet the following criteria:


a. twenty-five (25) years of age or older,


b. if applying as an individual, proof that the applicant


is a resident of this state pursuant to paragraph 11


of this subsection,


c. if applying as an entity, proof that seventy-five


percent (75%) of all members, managers, executive


officers, partners, board members or any other form of


business ownership are residents of this state


pursuant to paragraph 11 of this subsection,


d. if applying as an individual or entity, proof that the


individual or entity is registered to conduct business


in this state,


e. disclosure of all ownership interests pursuant to the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act,


and



Req. No. 636 Page 10


f. proof that the medical marijuana business, medical


marijuana research facility, medical marijuana


education facility and medical marijuana waste


disposal facility applicant or licensee has not been


convicted of a nonviolent felony in the last two (2)


years, or any other felony conviction within the last


five (5) years, is not a current inmate in the custody


of the Department of Corrections, or currently


incarcerated in a jail or corrections facility.


Upon reasonable suspicion that a medical marijuana business licensee


is illegally growing, processing, transferring, selling, disposing,


or diverting marijuana, the Authority, the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation (OSBI), or the Attorney General may subpoena documents


necessary to establish the personal identifying information of all


owners and individuals with any ownership interest in the business;


8. There shall be no limit to the number of medical marijuana


business licenses or categories that an individual or entity can


apply for or receive, although each application and each category


shall require a separate application, application fee, or license


fee. A commercial grower, processor and dispensary, or any


combination thereof, are authorized to share the same address or


physical location, subject to the restrictions set forth in the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act;

Req. No. 636 Page 11


9. No medical marijuana business premises is permitted to have


multiple licenses of the same type pursuant to the licensing


requirements of this section, excluding the following:


a. a commercial grower with a combination of an indoor or


outdoor growing facility on one parcel of land,


b. a licensed medical marijuana processor used by


multiple licensees, and


c. a licensed medical marijuana business that has an


approved application by the Authority while the new


business seeks registration from the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control


pursuant to Section 2 of this act;


10. All applicants for a medical marijuana business license,


research facility license or education facility license authorized


by the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act, or for


a renewal of such license, shall undergo a national fingerprint-


based background check conducted by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation within thirty (30) days prior to the application for


the license, including:


a. individual applicants applying on their own behalf,


b. individuals applying on behalf of an entity,


c. all principal officers of an entity, and


d. all owners of an entity as defined by the Oklahoma


Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act;

Req. No. 636 Page 12


11. All applicable fees charged by the OSBI are the


responsibility of the applicant and shall not be higher than fees


charged to any other person or industry for such background checks;


12. In order to be considered a resident of this state for


purposes of a medical marijuana business application, all applicants


shall provide proof of state residency for at least two (2) years


immediately preceding the date of application or five (5) years of


continuous state residency during the preceding twenty-five (25)


years immediately preceding the date of application. Sufficient


documentation of proof of residency shall include a combination of


the following:


a. an unexpired state-issued driver license,


b. a state-issued identification card,


c. a utility bill preceding the date of application,


excluding cellular telephone and Internet bills,


d. a residential property deed to property in this state,


and


e. a rental agreement preceding the date of application


for residential property located in this state.


Applicants that were issued a medical marijuana business license


prior to August 30, 2019, are hereby exempt from the two-year or


five-year Oklahoma residence requirement mentioned above;


13. All license applicants shall be required to submit a


registration with the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and

Req. No. 636 Page 13


Dangerous Drugs Control as provided in Sections 2-302 through 2-304


of this title;


14. All applicants shall establish their identity through


submission of a color copy or digital image of one of the following


unexpired documents:


a. front of a state-issued driver license,


b. front of a state-issued identification card,


c. a United States passport or other photo identification


issued by the United States government, or


d. a tribal identification card approved for


identification purposes by the Department of Public


Safety;


15. All applicants shall submit an applicant photograph; and


16. All applicants for a medical marijuana business license


seeking to operate a commercial growing operation shall file along


with their application a bond as prescribed in Section 427.26 of


this title.


F. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana business


application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and send the


approval, rejection, denial, or status-update letter to the


applicant in the same method the application was submitted to the


Authority within ninety (90) business days of receipt of the


application.



Req. No. 636 Page 14


G. 1. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana


business applications, conduct all investigations, inspections, and


interviews, and collect all license and application fees before


approving the application.


2. Approved applicants shall be issued a medical marijuana


business license for the specific category applied under, which


shall act as proof of their approved status. Rejection and denial


letters shall provide a reason for the rejection or denial.


Applications may only be rejected or denied based on the applicant


not meeting the standards set forth in the provisions of the


Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act and Sections


420 through 426.1 of this title, improper completion of the


application, unpaid license or application fees, or for a reason


provided for in the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient


Protection Act and Sections 420 through 426.1 of this title. If an


application is rejected for failure to provide required information,


the applicant shall have thirty (30) days to submit the required


information for reconsideration. Unless the Authority determines


otherwise, an application that has been resubmitted but is still


incomplete or contains errors that are not clerical or typographical


in nature shall be denied.


3. Status-update letters shall provide a reason for delay in


either approval, rejection or denial should a situation arise in



Req. No. 636 Page 15


which an application was submitted properly but a delay in


processing the application occurred.


4. Approval, rejection, denial or status-update letters shall


be sent to the applicant in the same method the application was


submitted to the Authority.


H. A license for a medical marijuana business, medical


marijuana research facility, medical marijuana education facility or


medical marijuana waste disposal facility shall not be issued to or


held by:


1. A person until all required fees have been paid;


2. A person who has been convicted of a nonviolent felony


within two (2) years of the date of application, or within five (5)


years for any other felony;


3. A corporation, if the criminal history of any of its


officers, directors or stockholders indicates that the officer,


director or stockholder has been convicted of a nonviolent felony


within two (2) years of the date of application, or within five (5)


years for any other felony;


4. A person under twenty-five (25) years of age;


5. A person licensed pursuant to this section who, during a


period of licensure, or who, at the time of application, has failed


to:


a. file taxes, interest or penalties due related to a


medical marijuana business, or

Req. No. 636 Page 16


b. pay taxes, interest or penalties due related to a


medical marijuana business;


6. A sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer or prosecuting


officer, or an officer or employee of the Authority or municipality;


7. A person whose authority to be a caregiver, as defined in


Section 427.2 of this title, has been revoked by the Authority; or


8. A person who was involved in the management or operations of


any medical marijuana business, medical marijuana research facility,


medical marijuana education facility or medical marijuana waste


disposal facility that, after the initiation of a disciplinary


action, has had a medical marijuana license revoked, not renewed, or


surrendered during the five (5) years preceding submission of the


application and for the following violations:


a. unlawful sales or purchases,


b. any fraudulent acts, falsification of records or


misrepresentation to the Authority, medical marijuana


patient licensees, caregiver licensees or medical


marijuana business licensees,


c. any grossly inaccurate or fraudulent reporting,


d. threatening or harming any medical marijuana patient,


caregiver, medical practitioner or employee of the


Authority,


e. knowingly or intentionally refusing to permit the


Authority access to premises or records,

Req. No. 636 Page 17


f. using a prohibited, hazardous substance for processing


in a residential area,


g. criminal acts relating to the operation of a medical


marijuana business, or


h. any violations that endanger public health and safety


or product safety.


I. In investigating the qualifications of an applicant or a


licensee, the Authority and municipalities may have access to


criminal history record information furnished by a criminal justice


agency subject to any restrictions imposed by such an agency.


J. The failure of an applicant or licensee to provide the


requested information by the Authority deadline may be grounds for


denial of the application.


K. All applicants and licensees shall submit information to the


Authority in a full, faithful, truthful and fair manner. The


Authority may recommend denial of an application where the applicant


or licensee made misstatements, omissions, misrepresentations or


untruths in the application or in connection with the background


investigation of the applicant. This type of conduct may be grounds


for administrative action against the applicant or licensee. Typos


and scrivener errors shall not be grounds for denial.


L. A licensed medical marijuana business premises shall be


subject to and responsible for compliance with applicable provisions


consistent with the zoning where such business is located as

Req. No. 636 Page 18


described in the most recent versions of the Oklahoma Uniform


Building Code, the International Building Code and the International


Fire Code, unless granted an exemption by a municipality or


appropriate code enforcement entity.


M. All medical marijuana business, medical marijuana research


facility, medical marijuana education facility and medical marijuana


waste disposal facility licensees shall pay the relevant licensure


fees prior to receiving licensure to operate.


N. A medical marijuana business, medical marijuana research


facility, medical marijuana education facility or medical marijuana


waste disposal facility that attempts to renew its license after the


expiration date of the license shall pay a late renewal fee of Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per week that the license is expired.


Late renewal fees are nonrefundable. A license that has been


expired for more than sixty (60) calendar days shall not be renewed.


Only license renewal applications submitted at least sixty (60)


calendar days prior to the expiration date shall be considered


timely submitted and subject to the provisions of subsection F of


this section. A medical marijuana business license shall remain


unexpired during the pendency of the application for renewal


provided that such application was timely submitted. The Authority


shall allow renewal applications to be submitted at least one


hundred twenty (120) calendar days prior to the expiration date of a


medical marijuana business license.

Req. No. 636 Page 19


O. Except as provided by this section, immediately upon


expiration of a license, any medical marijuana business, medical


marijuana research facility, medical marijuana education facility,


or medical marijuana waste disposal facility shall cease all


possession, transfer, or sale of medical marijuana or medical


marijuana products. Any continued possession, sale, or transfer


shall subject the business owners and operators to felony


prosecution pursuant to the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances


Act.


P. A medical marijuana business license holder shall require


all individuals employed under his or her license to be issued a


credential pursuant to the provisions of Section 427.14b of this


title prior to employment.


Q. An original medical marijuana business license issued on or


after June 26, 2018, by the Authority, for a medical marijuana


commercial grower, a medical marijuana processor or a medical


marijuana dispensary shall be deemed to have been grandfathered into


the location on the date the original license was first issued for


purposes of determining the authority of the business to conduct and


continue the same type of business at that location under a license


issued by the Authority, except as may be provided in Sections 425


and 426.1 of this title. Any change in ownership after the original


medical marijuana business license has been issued by the Authority


shall be construed by the Authority to be a continuation of the same

Req. No. 636 Page 20


type of business originally licensed at that location. Nothing


shall authorize the Authority to deny issuance or renewal of a


license or transfer of license due to a change in ownership for the


same business location previously licensed, except when a revocation


is otherwise authorized by law or a protest is made under the


municipal compliance provisions of Section 426.1 of this title.


R. A medical marijuana business license holder shall require


all individuals employed under their license to be issued a


credential pursuant to the provisions of Section 427.14b of this


title prior to employment.


S. The Executive Director of the Authority may promulgate rules


to implement the provisions of this section including, but not


limited to, required application materials to be submitted by the


applicant and utilized by the Authority to determine medical


marijuana business licensing fees pursuant to this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-636 CAD 1/2/2025 9:09:07 AM













Req. No. 636 Page 21